Tennessee, session 114, SB2435.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-238(a), is amended by
deleting "seven (7) days" and substituting "ten (10) days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2435
011914
- 1 -